Illinois, session 104th, HB2497.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 6b-5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/6b-5 new)7    Sec. 6b-5. Caseload tracking system.8    (a) The Department shall establish and operate a caseload 9tracking system which shall be designed to monitor and 10evaluate the interrelationship between case plans required 11under Section 6a, the case tracking system described in 12Section 6b, and the work responsibilities of the Department. 13The caseload tracking system shall prioritize the equal 14distribution of caseload burdens between the personnel of the 15Department. 16    (b) If the caseload tracking system generates data that 17shows a lack of equal distribution of caseload burdens between 18service areas of the Department established in accordance with 19Section 17a-2, the Department shall prioritize the 20reorganization of the service areas so as to equalize caseload 21burdens.